Nebraska, session 109, LB996.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB996 LB996
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Except as provided in this section, a person shall
not restrain a juvenile using shackling.
(2) A person who is authorized by law to restrain a juvenile may use
shackling to restrain such juvenile only if:
(a) The juvenile presents a substantial risk of inflicting physical
harm on himself or herself or others as evidenced by recent behavior;
(b) No less restrictive alternative will prevent such risk of harm;
and
(c) The use of shackling is limited to the duration strictly
necessary to prevent the risk of such harm.
(3) This section does not apply to the use of restraints under
section 43-251.03.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Shackling means the use of any mechanical restraint, including
handcuffs, leg irons, waist chains, belly chains, ankle restraints, a
restraint chair, or any combination of such devices, that restricts the
movement of a juvenile's arms, hands, legs, waist, or torso; and
(b) Shackling does not include the brief, temporary use of handcuffs
solely to address an immediate and articulable safety risk if such
handcuffs are removed as soon as such risk has passed.
Sec. 2. Section 43-2,129, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
43-2,129 Sections 43-245 to 43-2,129 and section 1 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
Sec. 3. Section 43-431, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-431 Policies and procedures of the Department of Health and Human
Services regarding the transportation of juveniles placed at the youth
rehabilitation and treatment centers shall apply to any private
contractor utilized by the Office of Juvenile Services to transport
juveniles placed at the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers. Such
-2-

LB996 LB996
2026 2026
policies and procedures shall prohibit the use of shackling in violation
of section 1 of this act and shall prohibit the routine use of any
mechanical restraint on juveniles during transportation. Any exception
shall be narrowly limited, documented in writing, and subject to review.
Sec. 4. Original section 43-431, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 43-2,129, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-3-